Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 3 Operation and Regulation
7-1-658.
Loans.

Credit unions may lend money to their members at reasonable rates of interest, which shall not exceed 1 1/4 percent each month on the unpaid balance, or such greater rates as shall be authorized for other financial institutions for such purposes as may be approved by the credit committee.

Loans shall be supervised as follows:

The credit committee shall have the general supervision of all loans to members. The credit committee shall hold such meetings as the business of the credit union may require and not less frequently than once each quarter to consider applications for loans. Reasonable notice of such meetings shall be given to all members of the committee. Actions of the credit committee shall be reported to the board in such form as the board shall prescribe at each regular meeting of the board. No loan shall be made unless it is approved by a majority of the entire committee, except as provided in this Code section;

The credit committee may appoint one or more employees to be loan officers and delegate to such persons the power to approve or disapprove loans to a borrower that do not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union subject to such limitations or conditions set forth in this Code section for loans generally and such further limitations and conditions as the credit committee prescribes. Records of loans approved shall be maintained in such form as the credit committee shall prescribe and shall be made available to the credit committee upon request. The credit committee may not appoint more than one of its members to be a loan officer. No person shall have the authority to disburse funds of the credit union for any loan which has been approved by such person;

In lieu of a credit committee, the board of directors may appoint one or more loan officers and delegate to such persons the power to approve or disapprove loans to a borrower that do not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union subject to such limitations or conditions set forth in this Code section for loans generally and such further limitations and conditions as the board may prescribe. All other duties of the credit committee as described in this article shall become the duties of the board of directors. Records of loans approved shall be maintained by the loan officers in such form as the board shall prescribe and a listing of all loans made, including the name of the borrower and the amount of the loan, shall be submitted to the board at each meeting; and

Members may appeal a credit decision made by a loan officer to the credit committee or to the board if denied by the credit committee. Where there is no credit committee, appeal shall be made to the board.

Loans may be made to officers, directors, and committee members of the credit union under the same general terms and conditions as to other members of the credit union; provided, however, that no officer, director, committee member, or employee shall participate in approving any loan in which he or she has a direct or indirect financial interest. The approval of all loans to officers, directors, and committee members of the credit union shall be reported to the board of directors at its next meeting.

As used in this Code section, the term “person” or “corporation” includes, but is not limited to, an individual, corporation, partnership, trust, association, joint venture, pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, or unincorporated organization.

No credit union shall be authorized to make loans to any one person or corporation where the aggregate of such loans and obligations together exceeds 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union unless each loan in excess of said 5 percent limit is approved in advance by the board of directors or the credit committee subject to the provisions set forth in subsections (f) and (g) of this Code section. Approval by the board of directors or credit committee shall be recorded in the formal minutes of the actions of the board or the credit committee by name of borrower, amount of loan, maturity of loan, general type of collateral, and such other information as required pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department. Any action required by this subsection may be taken as prescribed in Code Section 7-1-656, provided that the minutes of the proceedings of the board of directors or credit committee reflect such action and each director taking such action signs the minutes reflecting such action by no later than the next regular meeting of the board or credit committee attended by such director.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a credit union shall not directly or indirectly make loans or have obligations to any one person or corporation which in aggregate exceed 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union at the time of issuance of a binding commitment unless the entire amount of such loans and obligations is secured by good collateral or other ample security and does not exceed 25 percent of the net worth at the time of issuance of a binding commitment. Except as otherwise indicated in subsection (g) of this Code section, the purchase or discount of agreements for the payment of money or evidences of indebtedness shall be regarded as indirect loans to the person or corporation receiving the proceeds of such transactions. In estimating the legal lending limit for any one person or corporation, loans to related corporations, partnerships, and other entities shall be combined subject to regulations established by the department.

The limitations of subsection (f) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Obligations of and obligations guaranteed by:

The United States;

The State of Georgia or a public body thereof authorized to levy taxes;

Any state of the United States or any public body thereof if the obligations or guarantees are general obligations; or

Any agency of this state as defined in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 50-14-1;

Obligations to the extent secured by:

Obligations fully guaranteed by the United States;

Guaranties or commitments or agreements to take over or purchase made by any public body of the United States or any corporation owned directly or indirectly by the United States; or

Loan agreements between a local public agency or a public housing agency and an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to national housing legislation under which funds will be provided for payment of the obligations secured by such loan agreements;

Obligations with respect to the sale of federal or correspondent funds to financial institutions having their deposits insured to the same extent as that required of similar institutions chartered in this state;

A renewal or restructuring of a loan as a new loan or extension of credit following the exercise by the credit union of reasonable efforts, consistent with safe and sound banking practices, to bring the loan into conformance with the lending limits of this Code section, unless:

New funds are advanced by the credit union to the borrower, except as permitted under this Code section;

A new borrower replaces the original borrower; or

The department determines that a renewal or restructuring was undertaken as a means to evade the credit union’s lending limit; and

Unsecured obligations below the unsecured legal lending limit in conjunction with secured obligations below the secured legal lending limit so long as the total aggregate liability for both secured and unsecured obligations is $50,000.00 or less.

The department may, by regulation not inconsistent with this Code section, prescribe definitions of and requirements for transactions included in or excluded from the indebtedness to which this Code section applies. The department may, by regulation or otherwise, specify that the liabilities of a group of one or more persons or corporations or both shall be considered as owed by one person or corporation for the purposes of this Code section because the borrowers within the group are related through common control or the group meets other criteria established by the department for the combination of indebtedness for legal lending limitation purposes.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, approval of loans by the credit committee shall be evidenced, prior to disbursement of the loan proceeds, by a writing signed by a committee member stating that the committee has approved the loan. If the board appoints loan officers in lieu of a credit committee, it shall establish policies for approval of loans by those loan officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, §§ 14, 18; Code 1933, §§ 25-115, 25-116; Ga. L. 1962, p. 74, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, §§ 4, 5; Code 1933, § 41A-3109, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1681, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 10; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 5; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 16/HB 780; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 11/HB 781; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 28/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, substituted “directors, and committee members” for “directors, committee members, and employees” in the last sentence of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “to a borrower that do not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union” and “set forth in this Code section for loans generally and such further limitations and conditions” in the first sentence and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “All loans in excess of 50 percent of a credit union’s maximum loan limitation or such lower limit as the credit committee shall establish shall be acted upon by the credit committee”; in paragraph (b)(3), in the first sentence, inserted “a borrower that do not in the aggregate exceed 5 percent of the net worth of the credit union” and “set forth in this Code section for loans generally and such further limitations and conditions” and substituted “may prescribe” for “prescribes”; added subsection (d); redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (e); substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “No credit union shall be authorized to lend to any individual borrower on an unsecured loan more than 1 percent of the first $100,000.00 of its deposits and shares plus one-fourth of 1 percent of its deposits and shares over $100,000.00. No credit union shall be authorized to lend to any individual borrower on a secured loan more than 10 percent of the first $100,000.00 of its deposits and shares plus 4 percent of the next $1 million of its deposits and shares plus 2 percent of its deposits and shares over $1.1 million. Deposits and shares reflected in the statement of condition on the last calendar day of the preceding quarter, to the nearest $100,000.00, shall be used to establish loan limits for the subsequent calendar quarter, provided that where a credit union has less than $1 million in total shares and deposits, the nearest $1,000.00 shall be used to establish these limits. Any credit union may make loans up to $200.00 regardless of the amount of its shares and deposits. The amount loaned to any one borrower on an unsecured basis when added to the amount loaned to any one borrower on a secured basis shall not exceed the limitation set forth in this subsection for secured loans, such limitation being the maximum loan limit of the credit union.”; deleted former subsection (e), which read: “For purposes of subsection (d) of this Code section:

“(1) ‘Borrower’ means the member who actually received the proceeds from a loan and shall not include any obligation which he may incur by being an endorser, guarantor, comaker, or similar obligor for another borrower;

“(2) ‘Secured loan’ means a loan for which adequate collateral is given. A secured loan may include a loan for which there is an endorser, guarantor, comaker, or similar obligor.”; added subsections (f) through (h); redesignated former subsection (f) as present subsection (i); and substituted “Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, approval” for “Approval” at the beginning of subsection (i).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and” from the end of paragraph (g)(3), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (g)(4)(C), and added paragraph (g)(5).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “$1 million” was substituted for “$1,000,000.00” and “$1.1 million” was substituted for “$1,100,000.00” in two places in subsection (d).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, an extra period was deleted in the middle of paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of computation of finance charges in Georgia consumer credit contracts, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1978).

7-1-659.
Entrance fees; reserves; exclusion of state and federal credit union reserves from tax calculations.

A credit union may charge entrance fees as provided in the bylaws. All such fees shall, after payment of organizational expense, be known as reserve income and shall be added to the regular reserve of the credit union.

Immediately before the payment of each dividend, the gross earnings of the credit union shall be determined. There shall be set aside from that amount as an allowance for loan and lease losses, sums adequate to cover such anticipated losses, based on the risk characteristics of the loan portfolio.

All credit unions shall be subject to the capital and reserve requirements of Part 702 of the Rules and Regulations of the National Credit Union Administration, known as Prompt Corrective Action. Credit unions that are less than ten years old shall operate according to a business plan which shall contain requirements for reserves and which shall be approved by the department. The department shall have the discretion to require additional capital and reserves to assure the safety and soundness of any credit union.

In addition to regular reserves, special reserves to protect the interest of members shall be established when found necessary in any special case by the board of directors of the credit union or by the department.

All reserves of credit unions or federal credit unions established in accord with generally accepted accounting principles or upon the specific direction of the department or any federal regulatory body or for the purpose of complying with any conditions lawfully imposed by the department or any federal regulatory body shall not be considered as surplus or undivided profits of any credit union for tax purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 19; Code 1933, § 25-117; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-3110, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 8.

7-1-660.
Dividends; interest.

At such intervals and for such periods as the board of directors may authorize, dividends and interest from retained earnings may be declared at such rates as are determined by the board, provided that such dividends and interest shall not be paid until provision for the transfer to the allowance for loan losses has been made.
Dividends or interest in excess of 100 percent of a credit union’s net earnings before dividends shall be approved in writing by the department prior to payment, provided that an application from a credit union with net worth equal to or in excess of the requirements for a well-capitalized credit union, as defined by the National Credit Union Administration rules and regulations, shall be deemed to be approved five business days after the receipt of the dividend approval form by the department unless the department notifies the credit union that the dividend is not approved within this period.
The proposed dividend or interest may be paid after approval by the department upon its determination that such payment would be in the continued best interest of the credit union, would promote its stability, and would not impair its ability to repay its creditors other than its shareholders and depositors.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 13; Code 1933, § 25-113; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-3111, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 33; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 20/SB 82; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 7/SB 465; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387.

7-1-661.
Fiscal year; special meetings of members; voting and proxies.

The credit union fiscal year shall end at the close of business on December 31. Special meetings of the members may be held by order of the directors or on written request of 10 percent of the members. At all meetings a member shall have but one vote. No member may vote by proxy; but a society, association, partnership, or corporation having membership in the credit union may be represented by one person duly authorized by said society, association, partnership, or corporation to represent it. At any meeting the members may decide on any matter of interest to the credit union and may overrule the board of directors, provided the notice of the meeting shall have stated the question to be considered.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 11; Code 1933, § 25-121; Code 1933, § 41A-3112, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 12.

7-1-662.
Taxes to which subject.

Credit unions shall not be subject to any tax except the ad valorem tax upon property imposed by the Constitution of this state unless made subject thereto by express provision of the law specifically naming credit unions and making them subject thereto. All ad valorem taxes against credit unions shall be assessed upon the value of their shares, including surplus and undivided profits, and not upon their assets, other than real estate; and the rate of taxation shall not exceed the rate of taxation imposed on banking corporations, provided that, so long as federal credit unions are exempt from the payment of the tax imposed under this Code section, state credit unions shall likewise be exempt.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 24; Code 1933, § 25-123; Ga. L. 1943, p. 279, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-3113, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment, “If It Quacks Like a Duck:
In Light of Today’s Financial Environment, Should Credit Unions Continue to Enjoy Tax Exemptions?,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1367 (2012).

7-1-663.
Rules and regulations of department.

Without limitation on the authority conferred by Article 1 of this chapter, the department is authorized to make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with this article and other applicable statutes governing the operation of credit unions as it may consider reasonable and proper for the protection of all funds invested.
The department shall solicit comments from credit unions at least annually for recommended changes to the department’s rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 25-123.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-3114, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 21/SB 82.

7-1-664.
Credit union equipment, operations, and locations.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Automated teller machine” means electronic equipment which performs routine banking transactions, including, but not limited to, the taking of deposits for the public at locations off premises of a credit union’s main or branch office under regulations prescribed by the commissioner. Such term includes electronic equipment that utilizes, or has the capability to utilize, live video chat with offsite credit union personnel capable of assisting with banking services, including, but not limited to, account initiation.

“Cash dispensing machine” means an automated or electronic terminal which dispenses cash or scrip redeemable for goods and services or for cash, goods, and services; provided, however, that such terminal is not capable of initiating intrabank transactions other than those necessary and incidental to the dispensing of cash.

“Extension” means a location at which banking activity may occur but which is not a branch or main office.

“Night depository” means a drop box where customers can make deposits or payments outside of normal banking hours.

“Point-of-sale terminal” means electronic equipment located in non-credit union business outlets to record electronically credit union transactions occurring as a result of the sale of goods or services.

A credit union location shall be authorized to operate an automated teller machine, cash dispensing machine, night depository, or point-of-sale terminal without prior approval of the department; provided, however, that such extension complies with the requirements of this Code section and any rules and regulations of the department relating to notification.

A credit union may operate an extension as follows:

Any federally insured credit union may operate an automated teller machine at any location in the state;

Any credit union may operate a cash dispensing machine at any location in the state;

Any credit union may operate an automated teller machine or a cash dispensing machine individually or jointly with one or more credit unions;

Any credit union may operate a night depository or point-of-sale terminal at any location in the state;

Any credit union may operate an extension not defined in subsection (a) of this Code section, provided that such extension is located within 200 yards of the boundary lines of a single contiguous area of property owned or leased by the credit union and used as a credit union location. Prior to the operation of such extension, the credit union shall notify the department in writing; and

All other extensions must be approved by the department prior to the operation of such extension.

This Code section shall not apply to personal communication devices such as telephones, computer terminals, modems, and other similar devices which are not accessible to the general public but are intended for use by a single credit union member. The department may by regulation further define “automated teller machine,” “cash dispensing machine,” “night depository,” “point-of-sale terminal,” and “personal communication device” consistent with the objectives set forth in Code Section 7-1-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-664

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 12/HB 781.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to payment of deposits of deceased depositors in state and federal credit unions. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1967, p. 595, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-3115, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 34; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1388, § 4 and was reserved and repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 661, § 2, effective July 1, 1983.

7-1-665.
Designation of main office; operation of branch offices; factors in establishing branches; approval process; merger of credit unions.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Branch office” means any location of a credit union other than the main office where financial services are offered to members.

“Main office” means the principal location of a credit union as such location appears in the records of the department.

A credit union shall indicate its principal location with the department, and if it fails to do so, the department shall choose a location of such credit union to be the main office and shall so notify such credit union.

A credit union may maintain offices at locations other than its main office if the maintenance of such branch offices shall be reasonably necessary to furnish service to its membership. The establishment of branch offices shall be subject to the prior approval of the department upon application to it in such form as it may prescribe by regulation. Participation in shared branching networks does not constitute the establishment of branch offices under this Code section.

The department shall exercise its discretion in its consideration of an application to establish a branch office; provided, however, that the department shall not approve an application until it has satisfactorily ascertained that a need exists and the establishment of the proposed branch office would be advantageous to members. Such determination may be made upon consideration of the following factors:

Reasonable opportunity for the proposed branch office to generate a sufficient profit;

The character and fitness of the board of directors and management of the credit union to command the confidence of the membership and to warrant the belief that the business of the credit union at the branch office will be honestly and efficiently conducted;

The adequacy of the capital structure of the credit union, particularly in view of the anticipated business to be generated by the proposed branch office; and

The overall financial condition and safety and soundness of the applicant credit union.

Where the department by rule, regulation, or written policy has provided for expedited processing of applications or for notice procedures, it may abbreviate its review of these criteria.

After receipt of a complete application, the department shall have 30 days within which to approve or disapprove such application.

The department may approve an application contingent upon the satisfaction of additional conditions, including the submission of information such as the date of opening and the capital outlay for the branch office. The department may revoke such contingent approval if conditions in the approval have not been satisfied or if other violations of law occur as a result of the branch office’s opening or operation.

If the department disapproves an application to establish a branch office, it shall notify the applicant of its disapproval and state generally in writing the unfavorable factors influencing its decision. The decision of the department is final, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

The department may provide by regulation that a credit union which meets certain criteria may, in lieu of filing a branch application, file a written notification with the department.

In the event of merger or consolidation of two or more credit unions, the resulting credit union shall indicate its main office with the department and may retain and continue to operate as branch offices any or all credit union locations of the merged institutions which had been approved by the department prior to such merger or consolidation. In the event of the purchase of substantially all of the assets of a credit union, subject to the review and approval by the department of such transaction, the purchasing credit union may retain and continue to operate as branch offices any or all credit union locations of the selling credit union which had been approved by the department prior to such purchase.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3116, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 22/SB 82; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 13/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsections (a) and (b); designated the existing provisions as subsection (c); in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “may maintain” for “shall not be prohibited from maintaining”, substituted “main office” for “principal offices”, and inserted “branch”, and substituted “branch” for “additional” in the second and third sentences; and added subsections (d) through (i).

7-1-666.
Deposit insurance requirements; public notices when deposits not properly insured.

Every credit union shall be required to obtain deposit insurance satisfactory to the department before it may conduct business and accept deposits, except that credit unions which have had their deposit insurance coverage withdrawn or canceled may, in the discretion of the department, continue to accept deposits, provided that, within six months after withdrawal or cancellation of insurance, such credit unions shall obtain deposit insurance written by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state and acceptable to the department or by the National Credit Union Administration. The department may, in its discretion, for cause shown, extend the time limitation in which deposit insurance must be obtained.

Deposit insurance required to be obtained in subsection (a) of this Code section need not be in excess of amounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration at the time the insurance is obtained; but, whenever the insurance coverage is, in the opinion of the department, less than amounts insured by the National Credit Union Administration, the credit union shall be required to post a sign in boldface print, in letters at least four inches high, at a conspicuous place near the entrance of such credit union, which states “Deposits Not Insured” or “Deposits Insured Up To (insert amount of deposit insurance).” Such wording shall also follow the name of the credit union wherever it is written or printed and shall be posted in writing which is easily legible in letters at least one inch high at each window or desk receiving deposits.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3117, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

For similar provisions relating to deposit insurance requirements for banks, §

7-1-244

.

7-1-667.
Mergers.

A credit union may, with the approval of the department and in accordance with such uniform rules and regulations as it shall make and promulgate, be merged with another credit union under the articles of such credit union. Such merger may occur regardless of whether the credit unions serve the same field of membership, so long as there is adopted a plan agreed upon by the majority of the board of each credit union joining the merger and approved by not less than a majority of the members of the credit union being acquired present and eligible to vote at the meeting called for that purpose. The department may allow waiver of the member vote if, in its judgment, the merger is necessary to protect the safety and soundness of either or both credit unions. All property, property rights, and interests of the merging credit union shall, upon merger, be transferred to and vested in the continuing credit union without deed, endorsement, or other instrument of transfer; and the debts and obligations of the merging credit union shall be deemed to have been assumed by the continuing credit union; and thereafter the articles of the merging credit union shall be void.

The provisions of Article 8 of Chapter 4 of Title 14, relating to merger and consolidation, shall no longer be applicable to credit unions.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “credit union” shall include a federal credit union.

When a credit union merges with another credit union, one shall be designated as the continuing credit union by the credit unions participating in the merger. The participating credit union that is not the continuing credit union shall be designated as the merging credit union.

Upon adoption of the plan of merger, the parties to the merger shall file with the department a merger application, the articles of merger, and the fees required by Code Section 7-1-862. The articles of merger shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of each party to the plan of merger under their respective seals and shall contain:

The names of the parties to the plan and of the resulting continuing credit union;

The street address and county of the location of each main office, registered agent, and registered office;

The votes by which the plan was adopted and the time, place, and notice of each meeting conducted in connection with such adoption;

The name and county of residence of each director of the resulting continuing credit union; and

Any amendments of the articles of the resulting continuing credit union.

Upon receipt of the information set forth in subsection (e) of this Code section, the department shall conduct such investigation as it deems necessary to ascertain whether:

The articles of merger and supporting information satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The plan of merger and any modification thereof adequately protects the interests of members and other creditors;

The requirements for a merger under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting continuing credit union would satisfy the applicable requirements of this chapter; and

The merger would be consistent with adequate and sound banking practice and in the public interest on the basis of:

The financial history and condition of the parties to the plan of merger;

The proposed business plan; and

The character of their management.

The department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove a merger on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection. The department shall give written notice to:

The Secretary of State of its approval of a merger along with a copy of the articles of merger; and

The parties to the plan of its decision and, in the event of disapproval, a statement in general of the reasons for its decision.

The rights and privileges of the members of each merging credit union shall remain intact, provided that, if any person is a member of more than one of the participating credit unions, such person shall only be entitled to one set of membership rights in the continuing credit union.

In the case of a merger of a Georgia state-chartered credit union with any other credit union, with the Georgia state-chartered credit union as the continuing credit union, any assets, lines of business, activities, or powers which may accrue to the continuing credit union which would not be allowed for a Georgia state-chartered credit union shall be provided for in the plan of merger. Such plan shall include the proposal for holding or disposal of such assets or the continuation or termination of such line of business, activity, or power. The department shall review the plan to determine whether, in the interest of safety and soundness and consistent with the other objectives of Code Section 7-1-3, the activity, power, asset, or line of business should be approved, denied, or phased out within a reasonable period of time to be determined by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3118, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 23/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 24/HB 184; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 20/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 26/HB 185; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 33/HB 111.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (h).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsections (e) and (f), which read: “(e) The department may disapprove of a merger if it finds the merger would not be consistent with safe and sound practices.

“(f) The department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove a merger on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in subsections (a) and (e) of this Code section. The department shall give written notice to:

“(1) The Secretary of State of its approval of a merger along with a copy of the notice of merger; and

“(2) The parties to the plan of its decision and, in the event of disapproval, a statement in general of the reasons for its decision.”